Illinois, session 104th, HB4403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 56.1, 56.3, 56.4, 56.5, and 56.6 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/56.1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1056.1)7    Sec. 56.1. Acts prohibited. 8    (A) No person shall: 9        (a) Cause or allow the disposal of any potentially 10    infectious medical waste. Sharps may be disposed in any 11    landfill permitted by the Agency under Section 21 of this 12    Act to accept municipal waste for disposal, if both: 13            (1) the infectious potential has been eliminated 14        from the sharps by treatment; and 15            (2) the sharps are packaged in accordance with 16        Board regulations. 17        (b) Cause or allow the delivery of any potentially 18    infectious medical waste for transport, storage, 19    treatment, or transfer except in accordance with Board 20    regulations. 21        (c) Beginning July 1, 1992, cause or allow the 22    delivery of any potentially infectious medical waste to a 23    person or facility for storage, treatment, or transfer   HB4403 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1    that does not have a permit issued by the agency to receive 2    potentially infectious medical waste, unless no permit is 3    required under subsection (g)(1). 4        (d) Cause Beginning July 1, 1992, cause or allow the 5    delivery or transfer of any potentially infectious medical 6    waste for transport unless: 7            (1) the transporter has a permit issued by the 8        Agency to transport potentially infectious medical 9        waste, or the transporter is exempt from the permit 10        requirement set forth in subsection (f)(l); and . 11            (2) the potentially infectious medical waste is 12        accompanied by completed shipping papers meeting the 13        requirements of the federal hazardous materials 14        transportation regulations (Title 49 CFR Subtitle B, 15        Chapter I, Subchapter C) if required under subsection 16        (h) a potentially infectious medical waste manifest is 17        completed for the waste if a manifest is required 18        under subsection (h). 19        (e) Cause or allow the acceptance of any potentially 20    infectious medical waste for purposes of transport, 21    storage, treatment, or transfer except in accordance with 22    Board regulations. 23        (f) Beginning July 1, 1992, conduct any potentially 24    infectious medical waste transportation operation: 25            (1) Without a permit issued by the Agency to 26        transport potentially infectious medical waste. No   HB4403 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1        permit is required under this provision (f)(1) for: 2                (A) a person transporting potentially 3            infectious medical waste generated solely by that 4            person's activities; 5                (B) noncommercial transportation of less than 6            50 pounds of potentially infectious medical waste 7            at any one time; or 8                (C) the U.S. Postal Service. 9            (2) In violation of any condition of any permit 10        issued by the Agency under this Act. 11            (3) In violation of any regulation adopted by the 12        Board. 13            (4) In violation of any order adopted by the Board 14        under this Act. 15        (g) Beginning July 1, 1992, conduct any potentially 16    infectious medical waste treatment, storage, or transfer 17    operation: 18            (1) without a permit issued by the Agency that 19        specifically authorizes the treatment, storage, or 20        transfer of potentially infectious medical waste. No 21        permit is required under this subsection (g) or 22        subsection (d)(1) of Section 21 for any: 23                (A) Person conducting a potentially infectious 24            medical waste treatment, storage, or transfer 25            operation for potentially infectious medical waste 26            generated by the person's own activities that are   HB4403 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1            treated, stored, or transferred within the site 2            where the potentially infectious medical waste is 3            generated. 4                (B) Hospital that treats, stores, or transfers 5            only potentially infectious medical waste 6            generated by its own activities or by members of 7            its medical staff. 8                (C) Sharps collection station that is operated 9            in accordance with Section 56.7. 10            (2) in violation of any condition of any permit 11        issued by the Agency under this Act. 12            (3) in violation of any regulation adopted by the 13        Board. 14            (4) In violation of any order adopted by the Board 15        under this Act. 16        (h) Transport potentially infectious medical waste 17    unless the transporter carries completed shipping papers 18    for the potentially infectious medical waste that meet the 19    requirements of the federal hazardous materials 20    transportation regulations as set forth in 49 CFR Subtitle 21    B, Chapter I, Subchapter C a completed potentially 22    infectious medical waste manifest. No manifest or shipping 23    papers are is required under this Title for the 24    transportation of: 25            (1) potentially infectious medical waste being 26        transported by generators who generated the waste by   HB4403 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1        their own activities, when the potentially infectious 2        medical waste is transported within or between sites 3        or facilities owned, controlled, or operated by that 4        person; 5            (2) less than 50 pounds of potentially infectious 6        medical waste at any one time for a noncommercial 7        transportation activity; or 8            (3) potentially infectious medical waste by the 9        U.S. Postal Service. 10        (i) Offer for transportation, transport, deliver, 11    receive or accept potentially infectious medical waste for 12    which a manifest or shipping papers are is required under 13    this Title, unless the manifest indicates that the fee 14    required under Section 56.4 of this Act has been paid. 15        (j) Beginning January 1, 1994, conduct a potentially 16    infectious medical waste treatment operation at an 17    incinerator in existence on the effective date of this 18    Title in violation of emission standards established for 19    these incinerators under Section 129 of the Clean Air Act 20    (42 USC 7429), as amended. 21        (k) Beginning July 1, 2015, knowingly mix household 22    sharps, including, but not limited to, hypodermic, 23    intravenous, or other medical needles or syringes or other 24    medical household waste containing used or unused sharps, 25    including, but not limited to, hypodermic, intravenous, or 26    other medical needles or syringes or other sharps, with   HB4403 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1    any other material intended for collection as a recyclable 2    material by a residential hauler. 3        (l) Beginning on July 1, 2015, knowingly place 4    household sharps into a container intended for collection 5    by a residential hauler for processing at a recycling 6    center. 7    (B) In making its orders and determinations relative to 8penalties, if any, to be imposed for violating subdivision 9(A)(a) of this Section, the Board, in addition to the factors 10in Sections 33(c) and 42(h) of this Act, or the Court shall 11take into consideration whether the owner or operator of the 12landfill reasonably relied on written statements from the 13person generating or treating the waste that the waste is not 14potentially infectious medical waste. 15    (C) Notwithstanding subsection (A) or any other provision 16of law, including the Vital Records Act, tissue and products 17from an abortion, as defined in Section 1-10 of the 18Reproductive Health Act, or a miscarriage may be buried, 19entombed, or cremated. 20(Source: P.A. 101-13, eff. 6-12-19.) 21    (415 ILCS 5/56.3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1056.3)22    Sec. 56.3. Commencing March 31, 1993, and annually 23thereafter, each transporter of potentially infectious medical 24waste required to have a permit under subsection (f) of 25Section 56.1 of this Act, each facility for which a permit is   HB4403 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1required under subsection (g) of Section 56.1 of this Act that 2stores, treats, or transfers potentially infectious medical 3waste and each facility not required to have a permit under 4subsection (g) of Section 56.1 of this Act that treats more 5than 50 pounds per month of potentially infectious medical 6waste shall file a report with the Agency specifying the 7quantities and disposition of potentially infectious medical 8waste transported, stored, treated, disposed, or transferred 9during the previous calendar year. Such reports shall be on 10forms and in a format prescribed and provided by the Agency.11(Source: P.A. 87-752; 87-1097.) 12    (415 ILCS 5/56.4)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1056.4)13    Sec. 56.4. Potentially infectious medical Medical waste 14manifests and shipping papers. 15    (a) Until January 1, 2027, manifests Manifests for 16potentially infectious medical waste shall consist of an 17original (the first page of the form) and 3 copies. Upon 18delivery of potentially infectious medical waste by a 19generator to a transporter, the transporter shall deliver one 20copy of the completed manifest to the generator. Upon delivery 21of potentially infectious medical waste by a transporter to a 22treatment or disposal facility, the transporter shall keep one 23copy of the completed manifest, and the transporter shall 24deliver the original and one copy of the completed manifest to 25the treatment or disposal facility. The treatment or disposal   HB4403 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1facility shall keep one copy of the completed manifest and 2return the original to the generator within 35 days. The 3manifest, as provided for in this Section, shall not terminate 4while being transferred between the generator, transporter, 5transfer station, or storage facility, unless transfer 6activities are conducted at the treatment or disposal 7facility. The manifest shall terminate at the treatment or 8disposal facility.9    (b) Until January 1, 2027, potentially Potentially 10infectious medical waste manifests shall be on forms and in a 11format in a form prescribed and provided by the Agency. 12Generators and transporters of potentially infectious medical 13waste and facilities accepting potentially infectious medical 14waste are not required to submit copies of such manifests to 15the Agency. The manifest described in this Section shall be 16used for the transportation of potentially infectious medical 17waste instead of the manifest described in Section 22.01 of 18this Act. Copies of each manifest shall be retained for 3 years 19by generators, transporters, and facilities, and shall be 20available for inspection and copying by the Agency.21    (c) (Blank). The Agency shall assess a fee of $4.00 for 22each potentially infectious medical waste manifest provided by 23the Agency.24    (d) All fees collected by the Agency under this Section 25shall be deposited into the Environmental Protection Permit 26and Inspection Fund. The Agency may establish procedures   HB4403 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1relating to the collection of fees under this Section. The 2Agency shall not refund any fee paid to it under this Section.3    (e) Beginning January 1, 2027, shipping papers required 4under this Title for potentially infectious medical waste 5shall satisfy the requirements for shipping papers under the 6federal hazardous materials transportation regulations as set 7forth in 49 CFR Subtitle B, Chapter I, Subchapter C. 8(Source: P.A. 93-32, eff. 7-1-03.) 9    (415 ILCS 5/56.5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1056.5)10    Sec. 56.5. Potentially infectious medical Medical waste 11hauling fees. 12    (a) Permit applicants The Agency shall annually pay to the 13Agency collect a $2,000 $2000 fee for each potentially 14infectious medical waste hauling permit application and, in 15addition, shall pay to the Agency collect a fee of $250 for 16each potentially infectious medical waste hauling vehicle 17identified in the annual permit application and for each 18vehicle that is added to the permit during the annual period. 19Each applicant required to pay a fee under this Section shall 20submit the fee along with the permit application. The Agency 21shall deny any permit application for which a fee is required 22under this Section that does not contain the appropriate fee.23    (b) All fees collected by the Agency under this Section 24shall be deposited into the Environmental Protection Permit 25and Inspection Fund. The Agency may establish procedures   HB4403 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1relating to the collection of fees under this Section. The 2Agency shall not refund any fee paid to it under this Section.3    (c) The Agency shall not collect a fee under this Section 4from any hospital that transports only potentially infectious 5medical waste generated by its own activities or by members of 6its medical staff.7(Source: P.A. 93-32, eff. 7-1-03.) 8    (415 ILCS 5/56.6)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1056.6)9    Sec. 56.6. Potentially infectious medical Medical waste 10transportation fees. 11    (a) Each The Agency shall collect from each transporter of 12potentially infectious medical waste required to have a permit 13under Section 56.1(f) of this Act shall pay to the Agency a fee 14in the amount of 5 3 cents per pound of potentially infectious 15medical waste transported. Each The Agency shall collect from 16each transporter of potentially infectious medical waste not 17required to have a permit under Section 56.1(f)(1)(A) of this 18Act shall pay to the Agency a fee in the amount of 5 3 cents 19per pound of potentially infectious medical waste transported 20to a site or facility not owned, controlled, or operated by the 21transporter. The Agency shall deny any permit required under 22Section 56.1(f) of this Act from any applicant who has not paid 23to the Agency all fees due under this Section.24    A fee in the amount of 3 cents per pound of potentially 25infectious medical waste shall be collected by the Agency from   HB4403 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17216 BDA 30636 b1a potentially infectious medical waste storage site or 2treatment facility receiving potentially infectious medical 3waste shall pay to the Agency a fee in the amount of 5 cents 4per pound of potentially infectious medical waste received, 5unless the fee has been previously paid by a transporter.6    (b) The Agency shall establish procedures, not later than 7January 1, 1992, relating to the payment of fees under 8collection of the fees authorized by this Section. These 9procedures shall include, but not be limited to: (i) necessary 10records identifying the quantities of potentially infectious 11medical waste transported or received; (ii) the form and 12submission of reports to accompany the payment of fees to the 13Agency; and (iii) the time and manner of payment of fees to the 14Agency, which payments shall be not more often than quarterly.15    (c) All fees collected by the Agency under this Section 16shall be deposited into the Environmental Protection Permit 17and Inspection Fund. The Agency may establish procedures 18relating to the collection of fees under this Section. The 19Agency shall not refund any fee paid to it under this Section.20    (d) The Agency shall not collect a fee under this Section 21from a person transporting potentially infectious medical 22waste to a hospital when the person is a member of the 23hospital's medical staff.24(Source: P.A. 93-32, eff. 7-1-03.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 261, 2027.